Hawaii, session 2026, SB2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-181, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The sales price shall be established at the beginning of the rental term and shall remain fixed [for the first five years after the rental agreement is executed.] during the option period established by the corporation. During this period, the participant shall have the option of purchasing the unit at the designated sales price. If the participant does not elect to purchase the unit within the [five-year] option period, the renter shall forfeit the right to continue living in the unit and the unit shall be made available to another purchaser or renter." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________